Utah statutes.
53A-6-203.   Definitions.

As used in this compact and contracts made pursuant to it:

(1)  The words "educational personnel" mean persons who must meet requirements pursuant to state law as a condition of employment in educational programs.

(2)  The words "designated state official" mean the education official of a state selected by that state to negotiate and enter into, on behalf of his state, contracts pursuant to this compact.

(3)  The word "accept," or any variant thereof, means to recognize and give effect to one or more determinations of another state relating to the qualifications of educational personnel in lieu of making or requiring a like determination that would otherwise be required by or pursuant to the laws of a receiving state.

(4)  The word "state" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(5)  The words "originating state" mean a state, and the subdivision thereof, if any, whose determination that certain educational personnel are qualified to be employed for specific duties in schools is acceptable in accordance with the terms of a contract made pursuant to Section 53A-6-204.

(6)  The words "receiving state" mean a state, and the subdivisions thereof, which accept educational personnel in accordance with the terms of a contract made under Section 53A-6-204.

